Tennessee, session 114, SB1351.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 38, Chapter 6, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section, "investigative materials" includes, but is not limited to,
audio and video files, recordings, transcripts, documents, reports, paperwork, and other
print or digital media generated by the bureau and germane to an investigation by the
bureau.
(b) The bureau shall maintain copies of all original investigative materials with
the case file for each investigation by the bureau.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1351
003049
- 1 -